Louisiana, session 2026, HB455.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1017.1(6) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1017.1. Definitions
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and
terms, when used in this Part, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(6) "First responder" means a volunteer engaged in activities involving the
Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness pursuant to
R.S. 29:721 et seq., and first responders as defined in R.S. 29:723 including but not
limited to medical personnel, emergency and medical technicians, volunteer firemen,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1000 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 455
auxiliary law enforcement officers, state agency essential workers, emergency
service dispatchers, emergency response operators, electrical linemen and public
works first responders as defined by R.S. 29:723, and members of the Civil Air
Patrol.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 29:723(21) and 724(I) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§723. Definitions
As used in this Chapter:
* * *
(21) "Public works first responder" means a state, parish, or municipal
employee whose primary duties include public infrastructure operations,
maintenance, or repair, including but not limited to transportation, roads and bridges,
drainage, utilities, water and wastewater systems, fleet operations, solid waste, and
facilities maintenance, who is required to perform emergency response functions
during a declared emergency or disaster.
* * *
§724. Powers of the governor
* * *
I.(1) Public works first responders are hereby recognized as essential
emergency response personnel and shall be integrated into state and local emergency
preparedness, response, and recovery operations, including but not limited to all of
the following:
(a) Incident command and emergency operations center coordination.
(b) Debris clearance, infrastructure stabilization, and emergency repairs.
(c) Support of evacuation, sheltering, and reentry operations.
(d) Mutual aid and intergovernmental emergency response activities.
(2) Public works first responders may be issued emergency credentials and
identification for access to restricted areas during declared emergencies.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1000 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 455
(3) The designation of public works employees as first responders pursuant
to this Section is for emergency operations, coordination, and recognition purposes
only.
(4) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to:
(a) Alter eligibility for retirement systems or retirement benefits.
(b) Create presumptions related to workers' compensation or occupational
disease.
(c) Mandate hazard pay, premium pay, or additional compensation.
(d) Expand civil service classifications or collective bargaining rights.
(5) Any expansion of compensation, retirement, or benefits related to this
designation shall require separate and explicit legislative authorization.
(6) Public works first responders are eligible for inclusion in emergency
preparedness training, exercises, and planning activities coordinated by the
Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness and local
emergency management agencies, subject to available resources.